District of Columbia statutes.
34-2132

Potomac interceptor — Plans, construction, operation, and maintenance; charges for use.

(a)

Upon completion of the plan authorized by § 34-2131, the Mayor is authorized to provide for acquisition of rights-of-way, development of the detailed plans and specifications, and construction of the Potomac interceptor. When such interceptor is completed, it shall be operated and maintained by the Mayor as a part of a regional sanitary sewer system in cooperation with the proper authorities of the state and local jurisdictions concerned, under such regulations as may be prescribed by the Council of the District of Columbia.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to establish, by agreements with the appropriate agencies of the United States and with the proper authorities of the States and local jurisdictions concerned, charges for the use of the Potomac interceptor, which shall be based upon the costs of operation, maintenance, and amortization of the cost of all planning and construction (including acquisition of rights-of-way) of such interceptor, but which shall exclude such amount as may be appropriated pursuant to § 34-2133.

(c)

The Mayor shall also charge all users of the Potomac interceptor, including any agency of the United States for carrying, treating, and disposing of sewage in the sewerage system of and within the District of Columbia consistently with the provisions of §§ 2-207.01 and 2-207.02.

June 12, 1960, 74 Stat. 211, Pub. L. 86-515, § 2
Sept. 11, 1967, 81 Stat. 224, Pub. L. 90-84, § 1
Dec. 15, 1971, 85 Stat. 654, Pub. L. 92-196, title V, § 502
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 4(a), (b), 22 DCR 6316
1981 Ed., § 43-1622.
1973 Ed., § 43-1621.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(330) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.